Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 3. Water Quality

Bankruptcy trustee authorized to abandon valueless, noncomplying waste water treatment plant. —

The trustee in a Chapter 7 no-asset bankruptcy case was authorized to abandon property of the estate, i.e., a trailer park, which had no value to the estate and which was burdensome to the estate, even though the property, specifically a waste water treatment plant located thereon, was in a condition of noncompliance with state environmental laws. In re A & T Trailer Park, Inc., 53 B.R. 144, 1985 Bankr. LEXIS 6147 (Bankr. D. Wyo. 1985).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Hazardous Waste Cleanup in Wyoming: Legal Tools Available to the Private Citizen,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 395 (1984).

For article, “Wyoming's Groundwater Laws: Quantity and Quality Regulation,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 39 (1989).

For case note, “Environmental Law—Agricultural Pollution—The Uncertain Future of Clean Water Act Agricultural Pollution Exemptions After Concerned Area Residents for the Environment v. Southview Farm, 34 F.3d 114, 1994 U.S. App. LEXIS 24248 (2d Cir. 1994), cert. denied, 514 U.S. 1082, 115 S. Ct. 1793, 131 L. Ed. 2d 721, 1995 U.S. LEXIS 2889 (1995),” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 113 (1996).

For case note, “Hazardous Waste — The Supreme Court's Interpretation of RCRA: An Inequitable Result. KFC Western, Inc. v. Meghrig, 516 U.S. 479, 116 S. Ct. 1251, 134 L. Ed. 2d 121, 1996 U.S. LEXIS 1955 (1996),” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 699 (1997).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

61C Am. Jur. 2d Pollution Control §§ 718 to 1133.

Tort liability for pollution from underground storage tank, 5 ALR5th 1.

Necessity and sufficiency of environmental impact statements under § 102(2)(C) of National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 (42 USC § 4332(2)(C)) in cases involving water and waterworks projects, 67 ALR Fed 54.

What constitutes “issuing or denying” permit for discharge of pollutants within meaning of § 509(b)(1)(F) of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act (33 USC § 1369(b)(1)(F)) which authorizes judicial review of such action by administrator of environmental protection agency, 67 ALR Fed 365.

39A C.J.S. Health and Environment §§ 46, 131, 133 to 157.

Library References. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
172.03 (Matthew Bender).

§ 35-11-301.
Prohibited acts.

No person, except when authorized by a permit issued pursuant to the provisions of this act, shall:

Cause, threaten or allow the discharge of any pollution or wastes into the waters of the state;

Alter the physical, chemical, radiological, biological or bacteriological properties of any waters of the state;

Construct, install, modify or operate any sewerage system, treatment works, disposal system or other facility, excluding uranium mill tailing facilities, capable of causing or contributing to pollution, except that no permit to operate shall be required for any publicly owned or controlled sewerage system, treatment works or disposal system;

Increase the quantity or strength of any discharge;

Construct, install, modify or operate any public water supply or construct any subdivision water supply, except that no permit to operate shall be required for any publicly owned or controlled public water supply and a permit under this section shall not be required for subdivision water supplies consisting of individual wells serving individual lots of a subdivision.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.18; Laws 1982, ch. 73, § 2; 1987, ch. 227, § 1; 1997, ch. 179, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to the introductory language of subsection (a), see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

Purpose of section is to protect public from impure water

by assuring a sound public water supply system which satisfies some state criteria. Nickelson v. People, 607 P.2d 904,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 239

(Wyo. 1980).

Oil spilling into state river comes within scope of subsection (a)(iii)

since it clearly is “pollution,” altering the water's physical, chemical and biological properties. People v. Platte Pipe Line Co., 649 P.2d 208,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 368

(Wyo. 1982).

Owners of pipelines which discharge oil into state waters are liable regardless of fault

for damages and for the civil penalties set out in §

35-11-901

.People v. Platte Pipe Line Co., 649 P.2d 208,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 368

(Wyo. 1982).

Action, initiated prior to statutory enactment, dismissed. —

A gas station operator charged with violating §§

35-11-301

and

35-11-901

was entitled to have his action dismissed and his supersedeas bond released where an appeal of the damage decision against him was pending when these sections were enacted. V-1 Oil Co. v. People, 799 P.2d 1199,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 1990).

Cited

in

Board of Trustees v. Spiegel, 549 P.2d 1161,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1976); Belle Fourche Pipeline Co. v. Elmore Livestock Co., 669 P.2d 505,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 357

(Wyo. 1983).

Law reviews. —

For comment on the Wyoming Water Quality Act and the Federal Water Pollution Control Act Amendments of 1972, see IX Land & Water L. Rev. 79 (1974).

For article, “Industrial Siting Legislation: The Wyoming Industrial Development Information and Siting Act — Advance or Retreat?” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 27 (1976).

For case note, “Importation Doctrine Applied to Water Transfers Within a River System: A Step Too Far,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 99 (1980).

For case note, “Environmental Law — Strict Liability for Oil Spills in Wyoming. People v. Platte Pipe Line Company, 649 P.2d 208,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 368

(Wyo. 1982),” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 805 (1983).

For comment, “Hazardous Waste Cleanup in Wyoming: Legal Tools Available to the Private Citizen,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 395 (1984).

For comment, “State Participation in Federal Policy Making for the Yellowstone Ecosystem: A Meaningful Solution or Business as Usual?” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 397 (1986).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

State and local government control of pollution from underground storage tanks, 11 ALR5th 388.

Liability, under § 311(i) of Federal Water Pollution Control Act (33 USC § 1321(i)), of United States to owner or operator of onshore or offshore facility, or vessel, for removal costs of oil or hazardous substance, 59 ALR Fed 282.

What constitutes “discharge of dredged or fill material” into navigable waters, so as to be subject to permit requirements under § 404(a) of Federal Water Pollution Control Act (33 USC § 1344(a)), 72 ALR Fed 703.

Actions brought under Federal Water Pollution Control Act Amendments of 1972 (Clean Water Act)(33 U.S.C. §§ 1251 et seq.) — Supreme Court cases, 163 ALR Fed 531.

§ 35-11-302.
Administrator's authority to recommend standards, rules, regulations or permits.

The administrator, after receiving public comment and after consultation with the advisory board, shall recommend to the director rules, regulations, standards and permit systems to promote the purposes of this act. Such rules, regulations, standards and permit systems shall prescribe:

Water quality standards specifying the maximum short-term and long-term concentrations of pollution, the minimum permissible concentrations of dissolved oxygen and other matter, and the permissible temperatures of the waters of the state;

Effluent standards and limitations specifying the maximum amounts or concentrations of pollution and wastes which may be discharged into the waters of the state;

Standards for the issuance of permits for construction, installation, modification or operation of any public water supply and sewerage system, subdivision water supply, treatment works, disposal system or other facility, capable of causing or contributing to pollution;

Standards for the definition of technical competency and the certification of operating personnel for community water systems and nontransient noncommunity water systems, sewerage systems, treatment works and disposal systems and for determining that the operation shall be under the supervision of certified personnel. Prior to recommending these standards to the director, the administrator shall consult with affected municipalities, water and sewer districts, counties and treatment operators;

Standards for the issuance of permits as authorized pursuant to section 402(b) of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act [33 U.S.C. § 1342(b)] as amended in 1972, and as it may be hereafter amended;

In recommending any standards, rules, regulations, or permits, the administrator and advisory board shall consider all the facts and circumstances bearing upon the reasonableness of the pollution involved including:

The character and degree of injury to or interference with the health and well being of the people, animals, wildlife, aquatic life and plant life affected;

The social and economic value of the source of pollution;

The priority of location in the area involved;

The technical practicability and economic reasonableness of reducing or eliminating the source of pollution; and

The effect upon the environment.

Such reasonable time as may be necessary for owners and operators of pollution sources to comply with rules, regulations, standards or permits;

Financial assurance requirements for plugging, abandonment, post-closure monitoring, corrective actions and site reclamation for any class I hazardous waste or nonhazardous waste underground injection facility or class V coalbed methane underground injection facility as described in 40 C.F.R. Part 146. Rules, regulations, standards and permit systems recommended and prescribed under this paragraph shall apply only to any permit issued, renewed or transferred after July 1, 2018, under department of environmental quality regulations for a class I hazardous waste or nonhazardous waste underground injection facility or class V coalbed methane underground injection facility;

Standards for housed facilities where swine are confined, fed and maintained for a total of forty-five (45) consecutive days or more in any twelve (12) month period and the feedlot or facility is designed to confine an equivalent of one thousand (1,000) or more animal units. If any county adopts a land use plan or zoning resolution which imposes stricter requirements than those found in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph, the county requirements shall prevail. These standards shall include:

Financial assurance for accidents and closure requirements for facilities which contain treatment works;

Waste and manure management plans to prevent pollution of waters of the state, to minimize odors for public health concerns, pathogens and vectors capable of transporting infectious diseases and to specify land application requirements;

Setback requirements which will restrict the location and operation of structures housing swine and lagoons within:

One (1) mile of an occupied dwelling without the written consent of the owner of the house;

One (1) mile of a public or private school without the consent of the school’s board of trustees or board of directors;

One (1) mile of the boundaries of any incorporated municipality without the resolution and consent of the governing body of the municipality;

One-quarter (1/4) mile of a water well permitted for current domestic purposes without the written consent of the owner of the well;

One-quarter (1/4) of a mile of a perennial stream unless it is demonstrated to the department that potential adverse impacts to the water quality of the stream can be avoided.

Provisions for notice of intent to issue a permit and opportunity for public comment.

Standards for the determination of capacity development capabilities to ensure that all new or modified community water systems and new or modified nontransient noncommunity water systems commencing operation after October 1, 1999, demonstrate capacity development capabilities and by October 1, 2001, develop a strategy to assist all community and noncommunity water systems in acquiring and maintaining capacity development by adopting procedures governing capacity development in compliance with section 1420 of the Safe Drinking Water Act (42 U.S.C. § 300g-9). The department shall have the authority to require new systems in noncompliance of capacity development capabilities to take steps to correct inadequacies or cease water system operations;

Standards for subdivision applications submitted to the department under W.S.

18-5-306

. The administrator shall consult with county commissioners and the state engineer’s office in developing standards to recommend to the director.

The administrator, after receiving public comment and after consultation with the advisory board, shall recommend to the director rules, regulations and standards to promote the purposes of this act. The rules, regulations and standards shall prescribe:

A schedule for the use of credible data in designating uses of surface water consistent with the requirements of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act (33 U.S.C. sections 1251 through 1387). The use of credible data shall include consideration of soils, geology, hydrology, geomorphology, climate, stream succession and human influence on the environment. The exception to the use of credible data may be in instances of ephemeral or intermittent water bodies where chemical or biological sampling is not practical or feasible;

The use of credible data in determining water body’s attainment of designated uses. The exception to the use of credible data may be in instances where numeric standards are exceeded, or in ephemeral or intermittent water bodies where chemical or biological sampling is not practical or feasible.

Nothing in this act shall be construed to supersede or abrogate any valid water right. It is recognized that diversion of water caused by the exercise of a valid water right is an allowable practice. The administrator shall:

Develop water quality standards for surface waters where hydrologic modification resulting from the exercise of valid water rights precludes the attainment of existing water quality standards;

Prepare a schedule to develop appropriate water quality standards based on the completion of a use attainability analysis for any waters that have been identified pursuant to 33 U.S.C. § 1315(b) where dams, diversions or other types of hydrologic modification preclude the attainment of any existing water quality standard.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 250, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.19; Laws 1974, ch. 14, § 1; 1982, ch. 73, § 3; 1989, ch. 231, § 1; 1997, ch. 157, § 1; ch. 179, § 1; 1998, ch. 88, § 2; 1999, ch. 99, § 1; 2000, ch. 95, § 1; 2015 ch. 173, § 1, effective March 9, 2015; 2018 ch. 11, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2015 amendment,

added subsection (c).

Law 2015, ch. 173, § 1, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2015.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, rewrote (a)(viii), which read: “Financial assurance requirements for plugging, abandonment, post-closure monitoring and corrective actions, if required, for any underground injection facility for hazardous wastes as defined in Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations, Part 146.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2018, ch.
11, § 2, provides: “Before July 1, 2018, the department of environmental quality shall initiate the rulemaking process to implement this act.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

Applied

in

United States Steel Corp. v. Wyoming Envtl. Quality Council, 575 P.2d 749,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 270

(Wyo. 1978).

Stated

in

Wyo. Outdoor Council v. Wyo. Dep't of Envtl. Quality, 2010 WY 20, 225 P.3d 1054,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Feb. 25, 2010).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Industrial Siting Legislation: The Wyoming Industrial Development Information and Siting Act — Advance or Retreat?” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 27 (1976).

For comment, “Enforcement of Section 208 of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act Amendments of 1972 to Control Nonpoint Source Pollution,” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 419 (1979).

For case note, “Environmental Law — Strict Liability for Oil Spills in Wyoming. People v. Platte Pipe Line Company, 649 P.2d 208,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 368

(Wyo. 1982),” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 805 (1983).

For article, “A Guide to Permitting Confined Animal Feeding Operations in Wyoming,” see XXXV Land & Water L. Rev. 339 (2000).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability, under § 311(i) of Federal Water Pollution Control Act (33 USC § 1321(i)), of United States to owner or operator of onshore or offshore facility, or vessel, for removal costs of oil or hazardous substance, 59 ALR Fed 282.

Availability of Court of Appeals review, under § 509(b)(1)(E) of Federal Water Pollution Control Act (33 USC § 1369(b)(1)(E)), of action by Administrator of Environmental Protection Agency in approving or promulgating effluent and other limitations, 62 ALR Fed 906.

§ 35-11-303.
Duties of the administrator of water quality division.

In addition to other duties imposed by law, the administrator of the water quality division at the direction of the director:

May conduct on site compliance inspections of all facilities and works during or following the completion of any construction, installation or modification for which a permit is issued under W.S. 35-11-301(a)(iii) or (v); and

Shall establish as necessary for the efficient enforcement of this act water quality districts within the state and provide for a field office to be located within the boundaries of each district created.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 73, § 1; 1992, ch. 60, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Citizen's action against administrator of environmental protection agency to compel performance of nondiscretionary duty under § 505(a)(2) of federal Water Pollution Control Act Amendments of 1972 (33 USC § 1365(a)(2)), 57 ALR Fed 851.

§ 35-11-304.
Administrator required to delegate certain management functions to local governmental entities.

To the extent requested by a municipality, water and sewer district or county, the administrator of the water quality division, with the approval of the director, shall delegate to municipalities, water and sewer districts or counties which apply the authority to enforce and administer within their boundaries the provisions of W.S. 35-11-301(a)(iii) and (v), including the authority to develop necessary rules, regulations, standards and permit systems and to review and approve construction plans, conduct inspections and issue permits. Any authority delegated under this section shall be subject to the following conditions:

The delegation of authority under this section is limited to small wastewater facilities, publicly owned or controlled sewage collection and water distribution facilities and publicly owned or controlled nondischarging treatment works;

The delegation of authority under this section shall be by written agreement signed by the administrator and the local elected representative empowered to do so;

The local governmental entity has established rules, regulations and standards for the issuance of permits required under W.S. 35-11-301(a)(iii) and (v) which standards shall be at least as stringent as those promulgated by the state under W.S. 35-11-302(a)(iii);

The local governmental entity shall demonstrate to the administrator that all facilities will be approved by a registered professional engineer or city or county sanitarian for small wastewater facilities or other qualified individual approved by the water quality division administrator, and that it employs a properly certified waste treatment plant operator responsible for operation and maintenance of the treatment works in a manner at least as stringent as the department of environmental quality would require;

The administrator shall periodically review the standards and administrative and enforcement programs of each local governmental entity receiving a delegation of authority under this section and may with the consent of the director revoke or temporarily suspend the delegation agreement entered into with any entity which has failed to perform its delegated duties or has otherwise violated the terms of its agreement of delegation.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 73, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 35-11-305.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 141, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1982, ch. 73, § 1, prohibited the water quality division from maintaining a separate division laboratory unless authorized by the legislature.

§ 35-11-306.
Oil field waste disposal facilities; restriction.

In addition to any other requirement or restriction imposed under the Wyoming Environmental Quality Act, no person shall locate, construct or operate any commercial oil field waste disposal facility within one (1) mile of any:

Occupied dwelling house without the written consent of the owner of the dwelling; or

Public or private school without the consent of the school’s board of trustees or board of directors.

Any person who knowingly locates, constructs or operates a commercial oil field waste disposal facility in violation of subsection (a) of this section is subject to the penalties provided by W.S.

35-11-901

. The provisions of subsection (a) of this section relating to commercial oil field waste disposal facilities shall be enforced by the water quality division of the Wyoming department of environmental quality.

As a condition of receiving a permit pursuant to W.S.

35-11-301

, any person locating, constructing or operating any commercial oil field waste disposal facility shall post a bond as required by this section.

The council, by rules and regulations, shall establish bonding or financial assurance requirements for commercial oil field waste disposal facilities to assure there are adequate sources of funds to provide for:

Cost effective closure, post-closure inspection and maintenance, and environmental monitoring and control, including but not limited to:

Removal and disposal of buildings, fences, roads and other facility developments, and reclamation of affected lands;

Construction of any waste cover or containment system required as a condition of any facility permit;

Removal and off-site treatment or disposal of any wastes that are being stored or treated;

Decontamination, dismantling and removal of any waste storage, treatment or disposal equipment or vessels;

Operating any environmental monitoring systems or pollution control systems that are required as a condition of any facility permit or by order of the director; and

Conducting periodic post-closure inspections of cover systems, surface water diversion structures, monitor wells or systems, pollutant detection and control systems, and performing maintenance activities to correct deficiencies that are discovered.

The estimated costs of remedying or abating, in a cost effective manner, the violation or damages caused by the violation in the event of any discharge of pollution to the air, land or to waters of the state which is in violation of a permit, standard, rule or requirement established under the provisions of this act.

The bond established under subsection (d)(i) of this section shall be available during the operating life of the commercial oil field waste disposal facility to abate or remedy any violation of a permit, standard, rule or requirement established under the provisions of this act.

The amount of any bond or financial assurance requirement shall be established by the director in accordance with procedures contained in rules and regulations of the council, but shall not be less than an amount sufficient to satisfy the purposes specified in subsection (d) of this section.

The council shall provide rules for the establishment of a self-bonding program to be used if such a program will provide protection consistent with the objectives and purposes of article 3 of the act. In any such program, rules of the council shall provide for a timely reappraisal of pledged assets, require evidence of a suitable agent to receive service of process, assure that pledged assets are not already pledged for other projects, provide that pledged assets reside continuously in the state of Wyoming and provide for determination of the suitability of pledged assets.

In lieu of a bond, the facility operator may deposit federally insured certificates of deposit payable to the Wyoming department of environmental quality, cash or government securities, or all three (3).

Any bond may be cancelled by the surety only after ninety (90) days written notice to the director, and upon receipt of the director’s written consent, which may be granted only when the requirements of the bond have been fulfilled.

If the license to do business in Wyoming of any surety upon a bond filed pursuant to this act is suspended or revoked by any state authority then the facility operator, within thirty (30) days after receiving notice thereof, shall substitute a good and sufficient corporate surety licensed to do business in the state. Upon failure of the facility operator to make substitution of surety within a reasonable period of time, not to exceed sixty (60) days, the director shall suspend the facility permit to accept oil field wastes until proper substitution has been made.

Bond forfeiture proceedings shall occur only after the department provides notice to the operator and surety pursuant to W.S.

35-11-701

that a violation exists and the council has approved the request of the director to begin forfeiture proceedings.

With the approval of the council the director may:

Expend forfeited funds to remedy and abate the circumstances with respect to which the bond was provided; and

Expend funds from the account under W.S.

35-11-424

to remedy and abate any immediate danger to human health, safety and welfare.

If the forfeited bond or other financial assurance instrument is inadequate to cover the costs to carry out the activities specified in subsection (d) of this section, or in any case where the department has expended account monies under subsection (n) of this section, the attorney general shall bring suit to recover the cost of performing the activities where recovery is deemed possible.

When the director determines that the violation has been remedied or the damage abated, the director shall release that portion of the bond or financial assurance instrument being held under paragraph (d)(ii) of this section. When the director determines that closure activities have been successfully completed at any commercial oil field waste disposal facility, the director shall release that portion of the bond or financial assurance instrument being held to guarantee performance of activities specified in subparagraphs (d)(i)(A) through (E) of this section. The remaining portion of the bond or financial assurance instrument shall be held for a period of not less than five (5) years after the date of facility closure, or so long thereafter as necessary to assure proper performance of any post-closure activities specified in subparagraph (d)(i)(F) of this section. The retained portion of the bond or other financial assurance instrument may be returned to the facility operator at an earlier date if the director determines that the facility has been adequately stabilized and that environmental monitoring or control systems have demonstrated that the facility closure is protective of public health and the environment consistent with the purposes of this act.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 111, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “trust and agency” preceding “account” in (n)(ii) and (o).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

Savings clauses. —

Laws 1989, ch. 111, § 2, provides: “This act shall not prohibit the continued operation, at current level, of any facility in existence prior to the effective date of this act or prohibit the construction and operation of any facility for which a valid permit is issued prior to the effective date of this act.”

§ 35-11-307.
Commercial waste treatment, storage and disposal facilities.

In addition to any other requirement or restriction imposed under the Wyoming Environmental Quality Act, commercial waste treatment, storage and disposal facilities used for the management of more than ten (10) tons of dried wastewater treatment sludges or the equivalent thereto per operating day, are subject to the location restrictions and bond requirements provided for commercial oil field waste disposal facilities under W.S.

35-11-306

.

Any person who locates, constructs or operates a commercial waste treatment, storage and disposal facility in violation of the location restrictions provided by subsection (a) of this section and W.S. 35-11-306(a) is subject to the penalties provided by W.S.

35-11-901

. This subsection shall be enforced by the water quality division of the department of environmental quality.

The environmental quality council shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out this section including rules establishing bonding and financial assurance requirements in conformance with W.S. 35-11-306(d) through (p).

This section shall not apply to publicly owned waste treatment, storage and disposal facilities.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 67, § 1.

Wyoming Environmental Quality Act. —

See §§

35-11-101

and 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

§ 35-11-308.
Short title.

This act, W.S.

35-11-308

through

35-11-311

, may be known and shall be cited as the “Wyoming Wetlands Act”.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 110, § 1.

§ 35-11-309.
Legislative policy and intent.

The legislature declares that all water, including collections of still water and waters associated with wetlands within the borders of this state are property of the state. The legislature further declares that water is one of Wyoming’s most important natural resources, and the protection, development and management of Wyoming’s water resources is essential for the long-term public health, safety, general welfare and economic security of Wyoming and its citizens.

The legislature finds that agriculture, energy development, mining, highway construction and timbering are important industries in this state and that industrial concerns must be accommodated in the protection of wetlands. Wetlands can have an impact on industry practices. Even though property taxes are generally paid on such lands, wetlands provide limited economic return to the landowner. Wetland policies can obstruct water development projects and water management projects for private industry as well as public entities and can affect other developments.

The legislature finds that wetlands are considered important for a variety of reasons. Wetlands provide the habitat base for the production and maintenance of waterfowl and are sometimes critical to the survival of endangered plants and animals. Wetlands also serve to moderate water flow and have value as natural flood control mechanisms, can aid in water purification by trapping, filtering and storing sediment and other pollutants and by recycling nutrients, and can serve as groundwater recharge and discharge areas. Wetlands also function as nursery areas for numerous aquatic animal species and are habitat for a wide variety of plant and animal species, and provide vital habitat for resident wildlife. Wetlands also can provide scientific, aesthetic and recreational benefits. The legislature therefore concludes that wetlands and values associated therewith deserve to be effectively managed, protected and preserved.

The legislature recognizes that significant differences exist in Wyoming between naturally occurring wetlands and those wetlands that result from human activities. Because portions of Wyoming are arid or semiarid, water was diverted from streams and rivers for irrigating cropland, resulting in the creation of wetlands. These wetlands have partially compensated for wetlands losses. Additionally, road and highway construction, petroleum industry operations and other human activities have created wetlands where none previously existed. While these man-made wetlands are equally as important as naturally occurring wetlands, having the same characteristics and providing the same values and functions, management flexibility is required to acknowledge their different origins and to protect the property rights of landowners and water right holders.

In view of the legislative findings and conclusions of the importance of wetlands, water development and management, and industry in Wyoming it is hereby declared to be the wetlands policy of this state that water management and development and wetland preservation activities should be balanced to protect and accommodate private property, industry, water and wetland interests and objectives.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 110, § 1; 1994, ch. 56, § 1.

Appropriations. —

Laws 1999, ch. 81, § 5, as amended by Session Laws 2001, ch. 86, § 2, appropriates from water development account I $1,700,000.00 to the state engineer's office for the state's proportionate share of the capitalization of components to recover and remove from the endangered species act list four species of fish inhabiting the Upper Colorado River basin, and provides that funds not expended prior to July 1, 2005 are to revert back to water development account I. Session Laws 2001, ch. 86, § 3, appropriates from water development account I $50,000.00 for the conservation staff position, contingent upon Bureau of Reclamation matching funds, with funds remaining July 1, 2003, to revert back to water development account I.

Laws 2001, ch. 86, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 21, 2001.

§ 35-11-310.
Notice to drain waters required; exception.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, after July 1, 1996, no person shall drain water from a naturally occurring or man-made wetland, or any series thereof, which has an area comprising five (5) acres or more, without first notifying the department that the water which will be drained from the wetland, or any series thereof, will not flood or adversely affect downstream lands. Notification shall include the size and location of the wetland, and whether the wetland is natural or man-made.

Subsections (a) and (c) of this section do not apply to disturbances of wetlands resulting from mining operations conducted pursuant to mining permits issued by the department of environmental quality.

Any person draining, or causing to be drained, water of a naturally occurring wetland, or any series thereof, which has an area comprising five (5) acres or more, without first notifying the department as required by subsection (a) of this section, shall not be eligible to participate in the mitigation credit banking system as provided by W.S.

35-11-311

. Failure to notify the department pursuant to this section does not constitute a violation for purposes of W.S.

35-11-901

.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 110, § 1.

§ 35-11-311.
Mitigation; guidelines.

The department, after consultation with the Wyoming department of agriculture, state engineer, game and fish department, Wyoming water development commission and the department of transportation, shall adopt guidelines for evaluating ecological function and values and for establishing and administering a mitigation credit banking system for compensatory mitigation. The guidelines shall, at a minimum, provide for:

Criteria under which mitigation credits may be earned, with credit to be recognized for man-made wetlands created after July 1, 1991;

Geographical and other appropriate limitations for the application of mitigation bank credits;

Criteria for the use, banking or sale of banked credits;

The approval by the department for the earning, using, banking, transfer or selling of mitigation bank credits; and

Requirements for the maintenance and submission by the department of records concerning ecological function and wetland value losses, and credit and debit accounts for each mitigation bank.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 110, § 1; 1994, ch. 56, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.